Mississippi statutes. Title 49. Conservation and Ecology
Article 2. Mississippi Brownfields Voluntary Cleanup and Redevelopment Incentives Act.

§ 49-35-31.
Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the “Mississippi Brownfields Voluntary Cleanup and Redevelopment Incentives Act.”

HISTORY:
Laws, 2005, ch. 497, § 1, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2005.

§ 49-35-33.
Legislative findings; attractiveness of certain brownfields for redevelopment; provision of capital and labor for safe remediation of brownfields should be encouraged; reduction of public health and environmental hazards; survey and report of incentives for cleanup in other states.

The Legislature finds:

There are properties in Mississippi, often referred to as “brownfields,” that were contaminated or were perceived to have been contaminated by past activities, but are attractive locations for redevelopment.

The safe development or redevelopment of brownfields would benefit the citizens of Mississippi in many ways, including improving the tax base of local governments and creating job opportunities for citizens in the vicinity of brownfields.

Owners and prospective developers and redevelopers of brownfields, local governments in which brownfields are located and federal and state government agencies should be encouraged to provide capital and labor to improve brownfields so that the property can be determined to be safe or made safe for appropriate future use.

The reduction of public health and environmental hazards on existing brownfield sites is essential to creating a better quality of life for the citizens of this state.

Section 49-35-27, Mississippi Code of 1972, requires the Department of Environmental Quality to conduct a survey of incentive programs in other states for cleanup of contaminated sites by January 1, 1999. The department has conducted its survey and filed its report showing incentives provided in other states.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2005, ch. 497, § 2, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2005.